District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.05

District of Columbia government employee security training program.

(a)

The Director, in consultation with other District of Columbia agencies, law enforcement, security, and terrorism experts, and representatives of public employees, shall develop and issue guidelines for a public employee security training program to meet requirements established in the District of Columbia Emergency Response Plan.

(b)

At the request of the Director, District government agencies shall submit employee training programs to the Director for annual review.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 205
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794